Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1825
Real property taxes; redemption from sale; entry on record; notice to and payment of redemption money to certificate holder.

The county treasurer shall enter a memorandum of redemption of real property in the record and shall give a receipt therefor to the person redeeming the same. The county treasurer shall send written notice of redemption to the holder of the county treasurer's certificate of tax sale by first-class mail if the post office address of the holder of the certificate is filed in the office of the county treasurer or by electronic means if previously agreed to by the parties. The redemption money shall be paid to or upon the order of the holder on return of the certificate.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 212, p. 466;

Laws 1905, c. 114, § 1, p. 518;

R.S.1913, § 6540;

C.S.1922, § 6068;

Laws 1923, c. 105, § 1, p. 261;

Laws 1925, c. 168, § 1, p. 441;

C.S.1929, § 77-2020;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 8, p. 520;

Laws 1937, c. 167, § 28, p. 658;

Laws 1939, c. 98, § 28, p. 445;

Laws 1941, c. 157, § 28, p. 629;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2020;

R.S.1943, § 77-1825;

Laws 1967, c. 503, § 2, p. 1700;

Laws 1989, LB 324, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB370, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB341, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 25.